Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Professional Employment Commission

45.530.
Professional employment commission — Members — Chairman — Meetings — Compensation — Attached to executive department for finance and administration. [Repealed.]

45.535.
Duties of commission — Procedures for review and approval of contracts. [Repealed.]

45.540.
Procedures for awarding contracts to be developed by department of personnel. [Repealed.]

45.545.
Notice of disqualification to applicant — Order of cancellation or modification of contract by commission. [Repealed.]